District of Columbia statutes.
21-2118

Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

History

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-147, § 2, 45 DCR 3853
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 143, 47 DCR 520

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-2118.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-91 validated a previously made technical amendment.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 18 of the Uniform Statutory Form Power of Attorney Act.